Arkansas, session 2025, HB1760.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-27-317(a)(3), concerning applications
for adjustment of a county assessor's assessment of property, is amended to
read as follows:
(3) The county equalization board does not have jurisdiction
over and shall not accept or consider a petition or letter under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section for the adjustment of the:
(A) County assessor's determination of a property's tax-
exempt status under Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 5(b);
(B) Valuation of agricultural land, pasture land, or
timberland derived by the guidelines and methods set forth by the Assessment
*JLL303*
03/12/2025 2:20:06 PM JLL303

HB1760
Coordination Division under § 26-26-407; or
(C) Valuation of producing mineral rights in accordance
with the directions and methods established by the division under § 26-26-
1110; or
(D) County assessor's determination whether a property
qualifies for the homestead property tax relief provided for a person who is
disabled or a person sixty-five (65) years of age or older under Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 79, and § 26-26-1124.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-27-317(a), concerning applications for
an adjustment of a property assessment to a county equalization board, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(4) A petition for a claim under subdivision (a)(3) of this
section shall be filed with the county court of the county in which the
property is located, which has exclusive original jurisdiction under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 7, § 28, and § 14-14-1105.




















03/12/2025 2:20:06 PM JLL303